Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 40

Probate And Grant Of Administration

Subchapter 1

— Proceedings Generally

28-40-101. Character of proceeding.

The administration of the estate of a decedent from the filing of the petition for probate and administration or for administration until the order of final distribution and the discharge of the last personal representative shall be considered as one (1) proceeding for purposes of jurisdiction.

The entire proceeding is a proceeding in rem.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 40; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2101.

28-40-102. Venue.

The venue for the probate of a will and for administration shall be:

The proceedings shall be deemed commenced by the filing of a petition, the issuance of letters, and the qualification of a personal representative. The proceeding first legally commenced is extended to all of the property in this state.

(1)If proceedings are commenced in more than one (1) county, they shall be stayed except in the county where first commenced until final determination of venue by the circuit court of the county where first commenced.

If the proper venue is finally determined to be in another county, the court, after making and retaining a true copy of the entire file, shall transmit the original to the proper county.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 41; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2102.

Partition Suits.

28-40-103. Time limit for probate and administration.

No will shall be admitted to probate and no administration shall be granted unless application is made to the court for admission to probate within five (5) years from the death of the decedent, subject only to the exceptions stated in this section.

This section shall not affect the availability of appropriate equitable relief against a person who has fraudulently concealed or participated in the concealment of a will.

(1)Insofar only as it relates to real property in Arkansas, or any interest in real property, the will of a nonresident which has been admitted to probate in another appropriate jurisdiction may be admitted to probate in this state without regard to the time limit imposed by this section.

However, rights and interests in the real property which, after the death of the testator if it is assumed that he or she died intestate, have been acquired by purchase, as evidenced by one (1) or more appropriate instruments which have been properly recorded in the office of the recorder of the county in which the real property is situated and which would be valid and effective had the decedent died intestate, shall not be adversely affected by the probate of the will in this state after the expiration of the time limit imposed by subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 64; 1963, No. 166, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2125.

28-40-104. No will effectual until probated — Unprobated wills admitted as evidence.

No will shall be effectual for the purpose of proving title to or the right to the possession of any real or personal property disposed of by the will until it has been admitted to probate.

Except as provided in §28-41-101, to be effective to prove the transfer of any property or to nominate an executor, a will must be declared to be valid by an order of probate by the circuit court, except that a duly executed and unrevoked will which has not been probated may be admitted as evidence of a devise if:

No proceeding in circuit court concerning the succession or administration of the estate has occurred; and

Either the devisee or his or her successors and assigns possessed the property devised in accordance with the provisions of the will, or the property devised was not possessed or claimed by anyone by virtue of the decedent's title during the time period for testacy proceedings.

The provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of this section shall be supplemental to existing laws relating to the time limit for probate of wills, and the effect of unprobated wills, and shall not be construed to repeal §28-40-103 and subsection (a) of this section or any other law not in direct conflict herewith.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 65; 1981, No. 347, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-2126 — 62-2126.2.

28-40-105. Delivery of will by custodian.

After the death of a testator, the person having custody of his or her will shall deliver it to the court which has jurisdiction of the estate or to the executor named in the will.

(1)Upon the written motion of an interested person, the clerk shall issue a citation against any person who is alleged to possess the will of a testator directing that the alleged will be produced at a time specified in the citation.

A person who willfully refuses or fails to deliver a will after being duly ordered by the court to do so shall be guilty of contempt of court. He or she shall also be liable to any aggrieved party for damages which may be sustained by such a refusal or failure.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 42; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2103.

28-40-106. Powers of nominated executor prior to appointment.

Prior to the probate of the will and granting of letters testamentary, a person nominated in the will to be executor may take such steps as are reasonably necessary in the management and preservation of the property and rights of the decedent and, subject to the prior rights of members of the immediate family of the decedent, may arrange for his or her burial.

(1)If the court refuses to admit the proffered will to probate or the person shall not qualify as executor, he or she shall not be liable for his or her acts done in good faith and for which he or she would not be liable had he or she been the lawful executor.

However, promptly upon the appointment of a personal representative, the person shall account to the personal representative for steps taken and acts performed by him or her and deliver to the personal representative any assets of the estate which have come into his or her hands.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 43; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2104.

28-40-107. Petition for probate and appointment of personal representative.

An interested person may petition the court of the proper county:

For the admission of the will to probate, although it may not be in his or her possession or may be lost, destroyed, or outside the state;

For the appointment of executor if one is nominated in the will;

A petition for probate may be combined with a petition for the appointment of an executor or administrator. A person interested in either the probate of the will or the appointment of a personal representative may petition for both.

A petition for probate of a will or for the original appointment of a general personal representative, or for both, shall state:

The name, age, residence, and date and place of death of the decedent;

The names, ages, relationships to the decedent, and residence addresses of the heirs and devisees, if any, so far as they are known or can with reasonable diligence be ascertained;

The probable value, stated separately, of the real and of the personal property;

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, §§ 44, 45; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-2105, 62-2106.

28-40-108. Requests for notices.

(1)If an interested person desires to be notified before a will is admitted to probate or before a general personal representative is appointed, he or she may file with the clerk a demand for notice.

A demand for notice is not effective unless it contains a statement of the interest of the person filing it and his or her address or that of his or her attorney.

After filing the demand, no will shall be admitted to probate and no personal representative shall be appointed, other than a special administrator, until the notice provided in §28-40-110 has been given.

(1)At any time after the issuance of letters, any person interested in the estate may serve, in person or by attorney, upon the personal representative or upon his or her attorney and file with the clerk of the court where the proceeding is pending, with a written admission or proof of service, a written request stating that he or she desires written notice by ordinary mail of the time and place of all hearings on the settlement of accounts, on final distribution, and on any other matters for which any notice is required by law, by rule of court, or by an order in the particular case.

The applicant for such a notice must include in his or her written request his or her post office address and that of his or her attorney, if any.

Unless the court otherwise directs, after the request has been filed, the person shall be entitled to notice of all hearings for which any notice is required as aforesaid or of such hearings as he or she designates in his or her request.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, §§ 46, 47; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-2107, 62-2108.

28-40-109. Hearing on petition without notice.

Upon filing the petition for probate or for the appointment of a general personal representative, if no demand for notice has been filed as provided in §28-40-108, and if such a petition is not opposed by an interested person, the court in its discretion may hear it immediately or at such time and place as it may direct without requiring notice.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 48; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2109.

28-40-110. Notice of hearing on petitions.

If the petition for probate or for the appointment of a general personal representative is opposed, or if a demand for notice has been filed under the provisions of § 28-40-108, the court shall, and in all other cases the court may, fix a time and place for a hearing on the petition.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by one (1) or more of the methods set out in § 28-1-112 to each heir and devisee whose name and address is given, including notice other than by publication to each person who has filed demand for notice.

If it appears by the petition or otherwise that the fact of the death of the person whose estate is to be administered may be in doubt, or on the written demand of an interested person, a copy of the notice of the hearing on the petition shall be sent by registered mail to the last known residence address of the alleged decedent.

The notice required by this section shall be in substantially the following form:

Ark. L. Rev.

Notices under the Probate Code, 8 Ark. L. Rev. 324.

It was the duty of an executor or administrator, at his official peril, to give the notice to creditors required by former statute, but this duty was not a condition precedent to the exhibition of claims within the required period. Bennett v. Dawson, 15 Ark. (2 Barber) 412 (1855) (decision under prior law).

Notice took the form recommended by one statute, and the essence of the notice was that one heir was opening the decedent's estate, but the actual probate proceeding she pursued was for the collection of a small estate, and the notice required for that is found in another statute, and appellants testified that they did not receive personal notice, and this testimony was not actually disputed; the trial court clearly erred when it found that the heir satisfied the statutory procedures for collection of a small estate.Bryant v. Osborn, 2014 Ark. 143 (2014).

Cited: Chamberlain v. Crawford, 236 Ark. 468, 366 S.W.2d 897 (1963); Keenan v. Peevy, 267 Ark. 218, 590 S.W.2d 259 (1979); Boatman v. Dawkins, 294 Ark. 421, 743 S.W.2d 800 (1988).

“In the Circuit Court ofCounty, Arkansas

In the Matter of the Estate of, Deceased. No

Last known address

Date of death

(To be used where no will.)

The undersigned was appointed administrator of the estate of the above decedent on theday of, 20

(To be used when a will is probated and a personal representative appointed.)

An instrument datedwas on theday of, 20 , admitted to probate as the last will of the above named decedent and the undersigned has been appointed executor (or administrator) thereunder. Contest of the probate of the will can be effected only by filing a petition within the time provided by law.

(To be used when a will is probated but no personal representative appointed.)

An instrument datedwas on theday of, 20 , admitted to probate as the last will of the above named decedent. Contest of the probate of the will can be effected only by filing within the time provided by law a petition for an order revoking or modifying the order admitting the will to probate, and delivering a copy of such petition to the undersigned proponent(s) or the undersigned attorney for the proponent(s) at his (their) address hereunder shown.

(To be used in cases where a personal representative is appointed.)

All persons having claims against the estate must exhibit them, duly verified, to the undersigned within six (6) months from the date of the first publication of this notice, or they shall be forever barred and precluded from any benefit in the estate.

This notice first published, 20

In the Circuit Court of
County, Arkansas. Estate of
, deceased. To all persons interested in the Estate of
, (and to the said
, if he be not deceased): You are hereby notified that a petition has been filed in this court (to admit to probate the will of
, and) for the appointment of a personal representative for said estate; that said petition will be heard at
o'clock at
on the
day of
, 20 , or at such subsequent time or other place to which said hearing may be adjourned or transferred. Date
. Probate Clerk of the Circuit Court of
County, Arkansas

Click to view form.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 49; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2110; Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 277.

28-40-111. Notice of appointment of personal representative.

(1)(A)Promptly after the letters have been granted on the estate of a deceased person, the personal representative shall cause a notice of his or her appointment to be published stating the date of his or her appointment and requiring all persons having claims against the estate to exhibit them, properly verified to him or her, within six (6) months from the date of the first publication of the notice, or they shall be forever barred and precluded from any benefit in the estate.

Claims for injury or death caused by the negligence of the decedent shall also be filed within six (6) months from the date of first publication of the notice, or they shall be forever barred and precluded any benefit in the estate.

The notice shall state the mailing address of the personal representative.

If a will of the decedent has been probated, the notice shall also state the date of admission of the will to probate and that a contest of the order of probate can be effected only by filing a petition within the time provided by law.

(A)Within one (1) month after the first publication of the notice, a copy of the notice shall also be served upon each heir and devisee whose name and address are known and upon all unpaid creditors whose names, status as creditors, and addresses are known to or reasonably ascertainable by the personal representative, including the Department of Human Services if it is known or could reasonably be ascertained that the department has rendered services to the decedent, in accordance with §28-1-112(b)(1), §28-1-112(b)(2), or §28-1-112(b)(3).

(i)Notice to the department shall be served upon the Office of Chief Counsel, Decedent's Estates, P.O. Box 1437, Little Rock, AR 72203.

A copy of the petition for probate of a will or administration of an estate and the decedent's social security number shall be attached to the notice served upon the department.

(i)If, thereafter, the names and addresses of any such creditors are ascertained, a copy of the notice shall be promptly served upon them.

The burden of proof on any issue as to whether a creditor was known to or reasonably ascertainable by the personal representative shall be upon the creditor claiming entitlement to such actual notice.

When a will is to be probated without an administration of the estate, the notice shall be published by the proponents of the will and shall state the mailing address of each of the one (1) or more proponents and the name and address of the attorney for the proponents.

The notice shall be in substantially the following form:

(Administrator, Executor, Proponent, or Petitioner)

(Mail Address)”

(1)Publication of the notice shall be as provided in §28-1-112(b)(4) unless the value of the estate to be administered upon does not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), exclusive of homestead, in which event publication may be given by posting notice in the courthouse at a conspicuous place near a principal entrance for a period of three (3) weeks.

In addition, the court may by general rule, or by special order in a particular case, require that notice shall be given by ordinary mail to all persons whose names and addresses appear in the petition.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 50; 1953, No. 32, § 1; 1967, No. 287, § 1; 1985, No. 1007, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2111; Acts 1987 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 16, § 1; 1989, No. 929, § 2 [1]; 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 59, § 1; 1993, No. 415, § 2; 2009, No. 217, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1987 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 16, § 2, provided that this act shall be applicable to estates where administration is pending on June 12, 1987, and that if any notice required by this act has not previously been given by the personal representative, the personal representative shall give such notice within 90 days from June 12, 1987, if the claims of persons to receive notice are not barred by the expiration period set forth in §28-50-101.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “six (6) months” for “three (3) months” in (a)(1)(A) and the second paragraph of (c)(4); substituted “Circuit” for “Probate” in the line following the introductory language in (c); deleted the last sentence in the second paragraph of (c)(4), which read: “However, claims for injury or death caused by the negligence of the decedent shall be filed within six (6) months from the date of first publication of the notice, or they shall be forever barred and precluded from any benefit in the estate”; and made stylistic and minor punctuation changes.

28-40-112. Search for alleged decedent.

Whenever there is reasonable doubt that the person whose estate is to be administered is dead, the court, upon application of an interested person, may direct the personal representative to make search for the alleged decedent in any manner which the court may deem advisable, including, but not limited to, any or all of the following methods:

By inserting in one (1) or more suitable periodicals a notice requesting information from any person having knowledge of the whereabouts of the alleged decedent;

By notifying officers of justice and public welfare agencies in appropriate locations of the disappearance of the alleged decedent; or

By engaging the services of an investigating agency.

Ark. L. Rev.

Note, the Requirement of Notice in Probate Proceedings: Recent Changes in Arkansas Law, 43 Ark. L. Rev. 945.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 51; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2112.